Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act shall be known and may be cited as  the
Oregon Kratom Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Kratom product” means a  food, food product, food ingredient, dietary ingredient,
dietary supplement or beverage for human consumption containing any part of  the leaf of
the plant Mitragyna speciosa.
(2) “Processor” means a person, excluding a retailer, that:
(a) Sells, prepares, processes, manufactures, distributes or maintains  kratom products;
or
(b) Advertises, represents or holds  out as being a person that sells, prepares, processes,
manufactures, distributes or maintains a kratom product.
(3) “Retailer” means a person that sells, distributes or exposes for sale  kratom products
to individuals for personal consumption.
SECTION 3.
(1) A processor may not sell, prepare, process, manufacture,  distribute,
maintain or expose for sale a kratom product prior to registering with  the State Department
of Agriculture pursuant to section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A retailer  may not sell, distribute or expose for sale a kratom product sold, prepared,
processed, manufactured, distributed or maintained by a processor that is not  registered
with the department.
(3) The following kratom products may not be sold, distributed or exposed for  sale by a
processor or retailer:
(a) A kratom  product that is adulterated with a dangerous nonkratom substance. A
kratom product is adulterated with  a dangerous nonkratom substance if the kratom product
is mixed or packed with a nonkratom substance and that substance affects the quality or
strength of the kratom product to such a  degree as to render the kratom product injurious
to a consumer.
(b) A kratom product that is contaminated with a  dangerous nonkratom substance. A
kratom product is contaminated with  a dangerous nonkratom substance if the kratom
product contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious  nonkratom ingredient, including, but
not limited to, any of the substances listed in ORS 475.005 (6).
Enrolled House Bill 2646 (HB 2646-B) Page 1
(c) A kratom  product containing a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction
that is greater than two percent of the overall alkaloid composition of the product.
(d) A kratom product containing any synthetic alkaloids including synthetic mitragynine,
synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine or any other synthetically derived compounds  of the
Mitragyna speciosa plant.
(4) A processor  that violates subsection (1) of this section or a retailer that violates
subsection (2) of this section is  subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500 for the first
offense and not more than $1,000 for the second or subsequent offense. Upon request by the
processor or  retailer to whom an administrative fine is issued, the Director of Agriculture
shall conduct a hearing in accordance  with contested case proceedings under ORS chapter
183.
(5) A retailer does not violate subsection (2) of this section if it is shown  by a prepon-
derance of the evidence that the retailer relied in good faith upon  the representation of a
processor regarding the registration of the processor.
SECTION 4.
(1) A retailer may not distribute, sell or expose for sale a kratom product
to an individual under 21 years of age.
(2) A retailer that violates subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a  Class C
misdemeanor for each violation.
SECTION 5. The State Department of Agriculture  shall adopt rules necessary to carry
out sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act, including rules establishing:
(1) Standards for testing to ensure a kratom product is safe for human consumption;
(2) Standards for accurate labeling to ensure  safe and effective use of a kratom product
by consumers, including a recommended serving size;
(3) Procedures by which a processor may register with the department, including a  re-
quirement that the processor sign, under penalty of perjury, an affidavit  certifying compli-
ance with section 3 (1) and (3)  of this 2021 Act and any rules adopted by the department
under this section, including standards for testing and labeling;
(4) A model form for the affidavit described in subsection (3) of this section;
(5) A reasonable  registration fee to be paid to the department by a processor, subject to
annual adjustment not greater than the percentage  increase in the general cost of living as
measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items),
as published by the Bureau  of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor;
and
(6) Procedures by which a person may submit a complaint upon good-faith belief that:
(a) A processor has violated section 3 (1) or (3)  of this 2021 Act or any rule adopted by
the department under this section; or
(b) A retailer has violated section 3 (2) or (3) of this 2021 Act or any rule  adopted by the
department under this section.
SECTION 6.
The State Department of Agriculture shall set  the registration fee, pursuant
to section 5 (5) of this 2021 Act, for the first year in an amount not to exceed $2,500.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 2 to 7 of this 2021 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture may take any action before  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 2 to 7 of this 2021  Act.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,099,977, for implementing the Oregon Kratom Con-
sumer Protection Act.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House
Enrolled House Bill 2646 (HB 2646-B) Page 2
Bill 5014),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice,
for the General Counsel Division, is increased by  $304,964, for the purpose of assisting the
State Department of  Agriculture with implementing the Oregon Kratom Consumer Pro-
tection Act.
SECTION 11. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2646 (HB 2646-B) Page 3